North Dakota, session 69, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - PARKS AND RECREATION DEPARTMENT - WALKING
TRAIL RECREATION GRANT - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$75,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the parks and recreation department
for the purpose of providing a grant to a rural community experiencing a significant population
increase for a walking trail expansion project, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0874.01000